Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2927
Training; screening guidelines and safety procedures; State Court Administrator's office; duties.

(1) Mediators involved in proceedings under the Parenting Act shall participate in training approved by the State Court Administrator to recognize child abuse or neglect, domestic intimate partner abuse, and unresolved parental conflict and its potential impact upon children and families.

(2) Screening guidelines and safety procedures for cases involving conditions identified in subsection (1) of section 43-2939 shall be devised by the State Court Administrator. Such screening shall be conducted by mediators using State Court Administrator-approved screening tools.

(3) Such screening shall be conducted as a part of the individual initial screening session for each case referred to mediation under the Parenting Act prior to setting the case for mediation to determine whether or not it is appropriate to proceed in mediation or to proceed in a form of specialized alternative dispute resolution.

(4) The State Court Administrator's office, in collaboration with professionals in the fields of domestic abuse services, child and family services, mediation, and law, shall develop and approve curricula for the training required under subsection (1) of this section, as well as develop and approve rules, procedures, and forms for training and screening for child abuse or neglect, domestic intimate partner abuse, and unresolved parental conflict.

Laws 2007, LB554, § 8;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 58.